Utah statutes.
16-10a-802.   Qualifications of directors.
The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for
directors, except a director shall be a natural person.  A director need not
be a resident of this state or a shareholder of the corporation unless the
articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.
